North Dakota statutes. TITLE 54 State Government
CHAPTER 54-53 Upper Great Plains Transportation Institute

54-53-01.
Upper great plains transportation institute — Establishment.

There is hereby established an upper great plains transportation institute. Such institute must be administered by and in conjunction with the North Dakota state university of agriculture and applied science. The president and administration of the North Dakota state university of agriculture and applied science are responsible for the selection of personnel for and the administration of the institute.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 396, § 1.

54-53-02.
Advisory transportation council — Composition.

There is established a transportation council that shall serve in an advisory capacity to the upper great plains transportation institute. The director of the institute shall serve as the executive secretary of the council. The council shall elect its own chairman. The council membership consists of one representative from and appointed by the following:

The North Dakota chamber of commerce.

The North Dakota public service commission.

The North Dakota farmers union.

The North Dakota grain growers association.

The North Dakota wheat commission.

The North Dakota department of commerce.

The North Dakota grain dealers association.

The North Dakota motor carriers association.

The North Dakota aeronautics commission.

The North Dakota department of transportation.

The North Dakota department of agriculture.

The associated general contractors of North Dakota.

The North Dakota railway industry, appointed by the council.

The North Dakota primary sector of manufacturing, appointed by the council.

The North Dakota association of counties.

The North Dakota league of cities.

The lignite energy council.

A North Dakota member of the dakota transit association.

The North Dakota corn council.

Members of the council shall serve without pay, but they may receive reimbursement for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties, if authorized by the director.

The council shall consult with the institute in matters of policy affecting the administration of this chapter and in the development of transportation in the state of North Dakota. The council shall meet at the call of the chairman or director or upon the written request of three or more members of the council.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 396, § 2; 1991, ch. 95, § 44; 2001, ch. 488, § 49; 2003, ch. 502, § 1; 2007, ch. 489, § 1; 2009, ch. 516, § 1; 2011, ch. 436, § 1.

54-53-03.
Purpose — Powers and duties.

The purpose of the institute must be to conduct and supervise research in the field of transportation and logistics in order to facilitate acquisition of a wider knowledge and understanding of marketing factors associated with the geographical location of the state of North Dakota and the upper great plains in the field of transportation and their influence on the socioeconomic systems of the state, region, and country. Research areas must include the study of commodity and other freight movements into and out of the state in order to better know and understand the various factors affecting the marketing of area products and services. The institute shall make public its findings and conclusions in regard thereto together with any suggested solutions. In the administration of its duties under this chapter, the institute shall consult and coordinate with various governmental and nongovernmental agencies, shipper and producer groups, and carriers, in this state and in other states, interested in the field of transportation.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 396, § 3; 2003, ch. 502, § 2.

54-53-04.
Gifts and grants.

In order to carry out its duties under this chapter, the institute may contract for and accept private contributions and gifts and grants-in-aid from the federal government and other sources.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 396, § 4.